Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-1723
Securities Act of Nebraska; applicability of code.

Nothing in the Commodity Code shall impair, derogate, or otherwise affect the authority or powers of the director under the Securities Act of Nebraska or the application of any provision of the act to any person or transaction subject to such act.

Laws 1987, LB 575, § 23.

Securities Act of Nebraska, see section 8-1123.